Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.070

Members of corporation enumerated.

The members of a development credit corporation shall consist of such banks, trust companies, savings banks, mutual savings banks, savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, credit unions, insurance companies or union funds as may make accepted applications to this corporation to lend funds to it upon call and up to the limit herein provided.

[ 1959 c 213 s 7.]